District of Columbia statutes.
9-401.13

Use of bituminous macadam authorized.

The use of bituminous macadam is authorized on streets, avenues, and roads to be improved or paved.

June 26, 1912, 37 Stat. 150, ch. 182
1981 Ed., § 7-622.
1973 Ed., § 7-617.